Alaska, session 34, HB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 03.55 is amended by adding new sections to read: 04 Article 1A. Cats. 05 Sec. 03.55.080. Feral cats. (a) Subject to the approval of the landowner, a 06 person may release a community cat on land from which the cat was originally taken. 07 (b) A person who releases a community cat under this section is exempt from 08 state and municipal requirements applicable to ownership and care of domestic 09 animals and the release of a community cat under (a) of this section does not constitute 10 abandonment. 11 Sec. 03.55.095. Definitions. In AS 03.55.080 - 03.55.095, 12 (1) "community cat" means a feral cat that has been vaccinated for 13 rabies, has had its left ear tip removed, and has been spayed or neutered; 14 (2) "feral cat" means an unowned domestic cat living in a wild state 15 that is unsocialized for domestic human environments; 01 (3) "landowner" includes state, municipal, and private landowners. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.930 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 03 (h) This chapter does not prohibit the release of a community cat as allowed 04 under AS 03.55.080. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.